Hawaii statutes.
§125C-22 When set-aside required. When
a shortage as defined in section 125C-2 exists, all prime suppliers shall set
aside supplies of each petroleum product for which there is a shortage. The
amount set aside shall be in accordance with the rules adopted by the state
energy resources coordinator. [L 1984, c 238, pt of §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next